Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-181
Vehicle identification inspections;
training expenses; how paid.

The Nebraska State Patrol Cash
Fund shall be used to defray the expenses of training personnel in title document
examination, vehicle identification, and fraud and theft investigation and
to defray the patrol's expenses arising pursuant to sections 60-181 to 60-189,
including those incurred for printing and distribution of forms, personal
services, hearings, and similar administrative functions. Personnel may include,
but shall not be limited to, county treasurers, investigative
personnel of the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board, and peace
officers as defined in section 60-646. The training program shall be administered
by the patrol. The patrol may utilize the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training
Center to accomplish the training requirements of sections 60-181 to 60-189.
The superintendent may make expenditures from the fund necessary to implement
such training.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 81;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 50.